South Dakota, session 2026, SB107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 22-24B-22 be AMENDED:
22-24B-22. Terms used in §§ 22-24B-22 to 22-24B-28, inclusive, mean:
(1) "Community safety zone," the measurement of a straight line that creates an area
that lies within five hundred feet from the facilities and grounds of any of the
following sites:
(a) A domestic abuse shelter;
(b) A licensed day care center, as described in subdivision 26-6-14(3);
(c) A licensed group family day care home, as described in subdivision 26-6-
14(5);
(d) A public park, playground, or pool;
(e) A registered family day care, as defined by § 26-6-14.1;
(f) A school; or
(g) A sexual assault shelter.
The area includes the facilities and grounds of the site itself;
(2) "Loiter," to remain for a period of time and under circumstances that a reasonable
person would determine is for the primary purpose of observing or contacting
minors;
(3) "School," any public, private, denominational, or parochial school offering
preschool, kindergarten, or any grade from one through twelve accredited through
the Department of Education. This term does not apply to any facility where the
education of students might occur incidentally to the primary purpose of the
facility; and

26.701.11 2 107
(4) "Residence," the address a person lists for purposes of the sex offender registry
under subdivision 22-24B-8(3) and § 22-24B-12.
Section 2. That § 22-24B-23 be AMENDED:
22-24B-23. No person who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to
this chapter may establish a residence or reside within a community safety zone unless:
(1) The person is incarcerated in a jail or prison or other correctional placement which
is located within a community safety zone;
(2) The person is on parole or probation and has been assigned to a halfway house or
supervised living center within a community safety zone;
(3) The person is homeless and has been admitted to a community homeless shelter
within a community safety zone by an appropriate community official;
(4) The person is placed in a health care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 34-12,
or certified under Title XVIII or XIX of the Social Security Act as amended to
December 31, 2001, or receiving services from a community service provider
accredited or certified by the Department of Human Services or the Department of
Social Services, which is located within a community safety zone;
(5) The person was under age eighteen at the time of the offense and the offender
was not tried and convicted of the offense as an adult;
(6) The person established and inhabited the residence as of July 1, 2024;
(7) The site listed in subdivision 22-24B-22(1) was built or established subsequent to
the person's establishing residence at the location; or
(8) The circuit court has entered an order pursuant to § 22-24B-28 exempting the
offender from the provisions of §§ 22-24B-22 to 22-24B-28, inclusive.
A violation of this section is a Class 6 felony. Any subsequent violation is a Class 5
felony.
SB107 ENROLLED

26.701.11 3 107
An Act to add licensed and registered child care programs to the definition of community
safety zone.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 107
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 107 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB107 ENROLLED